Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 321.751 is amended to read:
321.751. (1) The Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund is  established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Western Oregon  Timber
Severance Tax Fund shall be retained by the Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund.
(2) Moneys are continuously appropriated from  the Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund
for use in reimbursing the General Fund for expenses incurred in the collection  of taxes imposed
under ORS 321.700 to 321.754.
(3) A working balance  may be retained in the Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund for
the payment of expenses  described in subsection (2) of this section. The balance of the Western
Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund, as of [ May] June 1 of each calendar  year, shall be distributed
as follows:
(a) 60.5 percent to the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008. A distribution made
under this paragraph shall be made on or before [ May] June 15 of the year.
(b) 4.5 percent to  the Community College Support Fund established under ORS 341.620. A dis-
tribution made under this paragraph shall be made on or before [ May] June 15 of the year.
(c) 35 percent to the Department of Revenue for further distribution  to the counties of this state
that are located in western  Oregon. Moneys distributed to the department under this paragraph are
continuously appropriated to the department for the purpose of making the payments  to counties
described in this paragraph. A distribution to the department made under this paragraph shall be
made on or before August  15 of the year. Each county’s share of the distribution made under this
paragraph shall equal the proportion of the assessed value of all small  tract forestland in western
Oregon that is located in that county. A distribution made by the department  to a county under this
paragraph shall be deposited in the county general fund.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 321.754 is amended to read:
321.754. (1) The Eastern Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund is established in the  State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Eastern Oregon Timber
Severance Tax Fund shall be retained by the Eastern Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund.
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 1
(2) Moneys are continuously appropriated from the Eastern Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund
for use in reimbursing  the General Fund for expenses incurred in the collection of taxes imposed
under ORS 321.700 to 321.754.
(3) A working balance may be retained in the Eastern Oregon  Timber Severance Tax Fund for
the payment of expenses described in subsection (2) of this section. The  balance of the Eastern
Oregon Timber Severance Tax Fund, as of [ May] June 1 of each calendar  year, shall be distributed
as follows:
(a) 60.5 percent to the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008. A distribution made
under this paragraph shall be made on or before [ May] June 15 of the year.
(b) 4.5 percent to  the Community College Support Fund established under ORS 341.620. A dis-
tribution made under this paragraph shall be made on or before [ May] June 15 of the year.
(c) 35 percent to the Department of Revenue for further distribution  to the counties of this state
that are located in eastern Oregon. Moneys distributed to the department under  this paragraph are
continuously appropriated to the department for the purpose of making the payments  to counties
described in this paragraph. A distribution to the department made under this paragraph shall be
made on or before August  15 of the year. Each county’s share of the distribution made under this
paragraph shall equal the proportion  of the assessed value of all small tract forestland in eastern
Oregon that is located in that county. A distribution made by the department  to a county under this
paragraph shall be deposited in the county general fund.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 321.751 and 321.754 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2025
Act apply to calendar years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.  ORS 475C.714 is amended to read:
475C.714. (1) The Department of Revenue shall administer and enforce  ORS 475C.670 to
475C.734. The department is authorized  to establish rules and procedures for the implementation and
enforcement of ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734 that are consistent with  ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734 and
that the  department considers necessary and appropriate to administer and enforce ORS 475C.670
to 475C.734.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall enter into  an agreement with the de-
partment for the purpose of :
(a) Administering and enforcing  those provisions of ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734, and rules or
procedures established for the purpose of implementing and  enforcing ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734,
that the commission and the department determine are necessary for  the effective and efficient ad-
ministration, implementation and enforcement of ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734 ; and
(b) Administering and enforcing taxes imposed under ORS chapters 316, 317, 317A and
318.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority shall enter into an agreement  with the department for the
purpose of:
(a) Administering and enforcing the provisions of ORS 475C.678,  and rules or procedures es-
tablished for the purpose of implementing and enforcing  ORS 475C.678, that the authority and the
department determine are necessary for the effective and efficient administration, implementation
and enforcement of ORS 475C.678 ; and
(b) Administering and enforcing taxes  imposed under ORS chapters 316, 317, 317A and
318.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475A.702 is amended to read:
475A.702. Duties and powers of Department of Revenue; rules; interagency cooperation.  (1) The
Department of Revenue shall administer and enforce ORS 475A.658  to 475A.714. The department is
authorized to establish rules and procedures for the implementation and  enforcement of ORS
475A.658 to 475A.714 that are consistent with ORS 475A.658 to 475A.714 and  that the department
considers necessary and appropriate to administer and enforce ORS 475A.658 to 475A.714.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall  enter into an agreement with the department for the
purpose of:
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 2
(a) Administering and enforcing those provisions of ORS 475A.658 to 475A.714, and rules  or
procedures established for the purpose of implementing and enforcing ORS 475A.658 to  475A.714,
that the authority and the department determine are necessary for the effective and  efficient ad-
ministration, implementation and enforcement of ORS 475A.658 to 475A.714 ; and
(b) Administering and enforcing taxes  imposed under ORS chapters 316, 317, 317A and
318.
SECTION 6. ORS 291.351 is repealed.
SECTION 7.  ORS 291.349, as amended by section 27, chapter 52, Oregon Laws  2024, is amended
to read:
291.349. (1) As soon as practicable after adjournment sine die of the  odd-numbered year regular
session of the Legislative Assembly, the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall report
to the Legislative Revenue Officer and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the estimate as  of July 1 of the
first year of the biennium of General Fund and State Lottery Fund  revenues that will be received
by the state  during that biennium. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall base its
estimate on  the last forecast given to the Legislative Assembly before adjournment sine die of the
odd-numbered year regular session on which the printed, adopted budget prepared in the  Oregon
Department of Administrative Services is based, adjusted only insofar as necessary to reflect
changes in laws adopted at that session. The report shall  contain the estimated revenues from cor-
porate income and excise taxes separately from the estimated revenues from other  General Fund
sources. The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services may revise the estimate if necessary
following adjournment sine die of a special session or  an even-numbered year regular session of the
Legislative Assembly, but any revision does not affect the  basis of the computation described in
subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(2) As soon as practicable after the end of the  biennium, the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall report to the Legislative Revenue Officer  and the Legislative Fiscal Officer,
or the Legislative Assembly if it is in session, the amount of General Fund revenues  collected as
of the last June 30 of the preceding biennium. The report shall  contain the collections from corpo-
rate income and excise taxes separately from collections from other sources.
(3) If the revenues  received from the corporate income and excise taxes during the biennium
exceed the amounts estimated to be received from  such taxes for the biennium, as estimated after
adjournment sine die of the  odd-numbered year regular session, by two percent or more, the total
amount of that excess shall be retained in the General Fund and used, in the manner described  in
ORS 291.345, to provide additional funding for public education, kindergarten through grade 12.
(4) If the revenues received from General Fund  revenue sources, exclusive of those described in
subsection (3) of this section, during the biennium exceed  the amounts estimated to be received from
such sources for the biennium, as estimated  after adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered year
regular session, by two percent  or more, there shall be credited to personal income taxpayers an
amount equal to the total amount of that excess[ , reduced  by the cost certified by the Department of
Revenue under ORS 291.351 as being allocable to credits described  under this subsection ]. The excess
amount to be credited shall be credited to personal income taxpayers in a percentage amount  of
prior year personal income tax liability as determined under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) If there is an excess  to be credited under subsection (4) of this section, on or before No-
vember 1, following the end  of each biennium, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
shall determine and certify to the Department of Revenue  the percentage amounts of credit for
purposes of subsection (4) of this section.  The percentage amounts determined shall be percentage
amounts to the nearest one-tenth of a  percent that will distribute the excess to be credited to per-
sonal income taxpayers.
(b) The percentage amount  applicable to subsection (4) of this section shall equal the amount
distributed under subsection (4) of this  section divided by the estimated total personal income tax
liability for all personal income taxpayers for tax years beginning in  the calendar year immediately
preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined.
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 3
(c) The amount of the surplus credit under subsection (4) of this section is determined  by
multiplying the percentage  amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection by the total
amount of a  personal income taxpayer’s tax liability for the tax year beginning in the calendar year
immediately preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined in order  to calculate the
amount to be credited to the taxpayer.
(d) The credit  shall be determined based on the tax liability as shown on the return of the tax-
payer or as corrected by the Department of Revenue.
(e) The credit shall be computed after the allowance of a  credit provided under ORS 316.082,
316.131 or 316.292, but before the allowance of any other credit or offset against tax liability allowed
or allowable under  any provision of law of this state, and before the application of estimated tax
payments, withholding or other advance tax payments.
(f) For personal income taxpayers, if  a credit applied against tax liability as described in para-
graph (e) of this subsection reduces  tax liability to zero and an amount of the credit remains unused,
the remaining unused amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer. For purposes of ORS  chapters 305,
314, 315 and 316,  refunds issued under this paragraph are refunds of an overpayment of tax imposed
under ORS chapter 316.
(g) The Department of Revenue may prescribe by rule  the manner of calculating and claiming
a credit if the filing status of a taxpayer changes between the tax year for which a credit may be
claimed and the succeeding tax year.
(6) A refund may not be made under this section to  a taxpayer if the amount of the refund is
less than $1.
(7) Not later than November  15 following the end of the biennium, the Department of Revenue
shall provide information  and guidance to taxpayers relating to the calculation of the credit. The
department may make the information and guidance available electronically or otherwise.
(8) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules specifying the manner for  issuing refunds under
this section to taxpayers who filed returns for the tax  year on which the credit is computed but who
are not required to file returns for the year in which the credit could be claimed.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 305.025 is amended to read:
305.025. (1) The Department of Revenue is established.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall consist of  administrative divisions. Each of the adminis-
trative divisions of the department  shall be headed by an administrator who shall be in the unclas-
sified service under the State Personnel Relations Law and appointed  by the Director of the
Department of Revenue.  Each administrator shall be well qualified by technical training and expe-
rience in the functions to be performed.
(3) The  Director of the Department of Revenue, from time to time, may alter or amend the or-
ganization of the department,  including its administrative divisions, as the director deems necessary
to achieve the greatest efficiency and economy in its operation.
(4) The director,  acting in concert with the chief officers of other state agencies charged with
raising revenue, shall use all reasonable means to increase efficiency and  economy by coordinating
work and  sharing resources with other agencies, including but not limited to the mutual use of field
officers and field auditors. [ With respect to such activity  the director shall cause to be prepared a re-
port relating to the utilization and coordination of revenue raising functions  of the state agencies
charged with such responsibility, including but not limited to suggested plans for  departmental or
governmental reorganization in the revenue raising field. Such report shall be submitted to  the Gover-
nor and the Legislative Assembly when it next convenes. ]
(5) The department  shall have an official seal, with the words “Department of Revenue” and
“State of Oregon” and such other  design as the director may prescribe. The seal shall be used to
authenticate all papers and proceedings requiring authentication.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 305.170 is amended to read:
305.170. The Department of Revenue:
(1) Shall  see that complaints concerning the law may be heard, information as to its effects may
be collected and all proper suggestions as to amendments may be made.
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 4
[(2) Shall report  to the Legislative Assembly, at each odd-numbered year regular session, the total
amount of taxes collected in the state for state, county and municipal purposes. ]
[(3)] (2) May investigate the tax laws of this and other states and the possible  taxable resources
of this state for the purpose of recommending  to the legislature methods by which a more just and
equitable system of taxation may be developed.
[(4) Shall recommend to the Legislative Assembly at each odd-numbered year regular session  such
amendments of the Constitution or laws as may seem necessary to remedy injustice  or irregularity in
taxation, or to facilitate the assessment and collection of public taxes and revenues. ]
SECTION 10. ORS 311.175 and 311.183 are repealed.
SECTION 11.  ORS 327.011 is amended to read:
327.011. For the purpose of State School Fund distributions for school districts:
(1) Local Revenues are the total of the following:
(a) The amount of revenue offset against local property taxes as determined by the  Department
of Revenue [ under ORS 311.175 (3)(a)(A) ].
(b) The amount of property taxes actually received by the district, including penalties and  in-
terest on taxes.
(c) The amount of revenue received  by the district from the Common School Fund under ORS
327.403 to 327.410.
(d) The amount of revenue received by the district from the county school fund.
(e) The amount of revenue received by  the district from state managed forestlands under ORS
530.115 (1)(b) and (c).
(f) Moneys received in lieu of property taxes.
(g) Federal funds received without specific application by the school district and that are not
deemed under federal law to be nonsupplantable.
(h) Any positive amount obtained by subtracting  the operating property taxes actually imposed
by the district, based on the rate certified pursuant to  ORS 310.060, from the amount that would
have been imposed by the district if the district had certified the  maximum rate of operating prop-
erty taxes allowed by law.
(i) Any amount distributed to the district in the prior fiscal year under ORS 327.019 (8).
(2) Local Revenues do not include:
(a) If a school district imposes local option taxes pursuant to ORS 280.040  to 280.145, an amount
equal to the least of:
(A) The amount of revenue actually received by the district from  local option taxes imposed
pursuant to ORS 280.040 to 280.145;
(B) Twenty-five percent  of the total received by the school district from the general purpose
grant, the transportation grant and the high  cost disabilities grant of the district, as those grants
are calculated under ORS 327.013; or
(C) $2,000 per district extended ADMw, as calculated under  ORS 327.013, increased each fiscal
year by three percent above the amount allowed per district extended ADMw  for the prior fiscal
year.
(b) For a school district with a  statutory rate limit on July 1, 2003, that is greater than $4.50
per $1,000 of assessed value, the amount of property taxes actually  received by the district, includ-
ing penalties and interest on  taxes, that results from an increase in the rate of ad valorem property
tax of the district allowed under Article XI, section 11 (5)(d), of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 327.019 is amended to read:
327.019. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education service district extended ADMw” means the sum of the extended ADMw  of the
school districts located within the territory of the  education service district as computed under ORS
327.013.
(b) “Local revenues of an education service district” means the total of the following:
(A) The amount of revenue offset against  local property taxes as determined by the Department
of Revenue [ under ORS 311.175 (3)(a)(A) ];
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 5
(B) The amount of property taxes actually received by the district including penalties  and in-
terest on taxes;
(C) The amount of revenue received by  the district from state-managed forestlands under ORS
530.115 (1)(b) and (c); and
(D) Any positive amount obtained by subtracting the operating property taxes actually imposed
by the district based on the rate certified pursuant  to ORS 310.060 from the amount that would have
been imposed by the district  if the district had certified the maximum rate of operating property
taxes allowed by law.
(2) Each fiscal year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall calculate a State School Fund
grant for each education service district as provided in this section.
(3)(a) Each fiscal year, the superintendent shall calculate  the total amount appropriated or al-
located to the  State School Fund and available for distribution to school districts, education service
districts and programs + total amount of local  revenues of all school districts, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011, + total amount of local revenues of all education  service districts. The su-
perintendent may not include in the calculation  under this paragraph amounts received by the
Department of Education from the State School Fund under ORS 343.243.
(b) The superintendent shall multiply the amount calculated  under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section by 95.5 percent.
(c) Based on the amount calculated under  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the superintendent
shall calculate a funding percentage to  distribute as nearly as practicable under ORS 327.006 to
327.133, 327.348 and 327.356 to 327.359 the total amount calculated under paragraph (b)  of this sub-
section as school district  general purpose grants, high cost disabilities grants and transportation
grants to school districts.
(d) Based on the funding percentage  calculated under paragraph (c) of this subsection, the su-
perintendent shall calculate the general purpose grant, transportation grant and high cost  disabili-
ties grant amounts for each school district.
(4)(a) The general services grant for an education service district shall equal the higher of:
(A) The total amount calculated  under subsection (3)(d) of this section for the school districts
located within the territory of the education service district ×  (4.5 ÷  95.5); or
(B) $1,165,000, as adjusted each  school year based on the same percentage by which the amount
appropriated to the State School Fund for distribution to education service districts is  increased or
decreased as compared  with the amount appropriated for the 2015-2016 school year, if the education
service district received a general services grant of $1 million for the 2010-2011 school year.
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection and only for State School Fund distrib-
utions made for the first school  year after two or more education service districts join together, if
an education service district received a general services grant as provided by paragraph (a)(B)  of
this subsection prior to the education service district joining together  with one or more other edu-
cation service districts to form a new education service district:
(A) The general services grant for the new  education service district shall be calculated for
each component education service district as though the component education  service districts had
not joined together to form a new education service district; and
(B) A component education service district  that received an amount as provided by paragraph
(a)(B) of this subsection shall be  entitled to receive that amount under the calculation provided by
this paragraph.
(5) Subject to subsection  (6) of this section, the State School Fund grant for an education service
district = general services grant − local revenues of the education service district.
(6)(a) After completing  the calculations under subsections (2) to (5) of this section, the Super-
intendent of Public Instruction shall apportion  from the State School Fund to each education service
district an amount = (funding percentage × general services grant) − local  revenues of the edu-
cation service district.
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 6
(b) The funding percentage used in paragraph (a) of  this subsection shall be calculated by the
superintendent to distribute as nearly as practicable the total  amount available for distribution to
education service districts from the State School Fund for each fiscal year.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (5) and (6) of this section:
(a) The State School Fund grant of an education service district may  not be less than zero; and
(b) The State School Fund grant of an education service district shall be in an amount  that,
when combined with the local revenues of the education service district, equals $1,165,000, as  ad-
justed each school year  based on the same percentage by which the amount appropriated to the
State School Fund for distribution to education service districts is increased  or decreased as com-
pared with the amount appropriated for the 2015-2016 school year.
(8) An education service district shall  distribute to school districts located within the territory
of the education service district any amount of local revenues of the  education service district that
is greater than the general services grant.  The amount that each school district receives under this
subsection shall be prorated based on the district extended  ADMw of the school district as calcu-
lated under ORS 327.013.
(9)(a) An education service district shall distribute to a school district that is  located within the
territory of the education service district but that  has withdrawn from the education service district
as provided in ORS 334.015 the amounts received by the education service district as  a general
services grant and from the School Improvement Fund.
(b) The amounts that a school district receives under this subsection:
(A) Shall be prorated based on the district extended ADMw of the school district  as calculated
under ORS 327.013;
(B) Shall  equal 90 percent of the school district’s prorated share, as calculated under subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph; and
(C) May be used to pay for any expenses incurred in providing services described in ORS 334.175
(2) to the students of the school district by:
(i) The school district;
(ii) The education service district from which the school district withdrew;
(iii) An education service district that is not the education service district  from which the
school district withdrew; or
(iv) Any other public  entity with which the school district has entered into a contract to provide
the services.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 327.061 is amended to read:
327.061. (1)(a) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula
as specified in ORS 327.013 (1)(c), shall be projections of the average  daily membership in the school
district for the school year ending on June 30 of  the distribution year. The Department of Education
shall verify all projections used for purposes of the distribution formula.
(b) For the purpose of paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A student may be included in average  daily membership only if the student is reported with
a school identification number, as issued in  accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of
Education.
(B) A student may not be included in average daily membership if the  student has only a pro-
gram identification number. As used in this subparagraph, “program”  means a series of interrelated
activities or services  contributing to the attainment of a goal or set of goals that are provided on
a part-time basis, for a temporary time period or as  a secondary component of educational services.
(2) The department shall use information from the Department of Revenue  [ under ORS 311.175 ]
as the basis for determining projected school district property taxes. The department shall  request
relevant information from the school districts to enable the department to  estimate the amount each
school district shall receive from  the State School Fund. The department shall provide this estimate
no later  than the first Monday in March of each year for the distribution for the following fiscal
year.
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 7
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a school district may appeal to  the de-
partment any projection verified by  the department under subsection (1) of this section. The de-
partment shall rule on the appeal in a timely manner  and if necessary issue a revised estimate of
the amount each school district shall receive from the  State School Fund no later than the last
Friday in March.
(4) A school district  may not appeal any projection verified under subsection (1) of this section
if the school district failed to provide information requested  by the department under subsection (2)
of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding the dates provided by this section and  pursuant to rules adopted by the
State Board of Education, the Superintendent of  Public Instruction may specify an alternative date
to provide an estimate or revised estimate if a  human-created disaster or a natural disaster affects
the ability of the Department of Education to provide the estimate  or revised estimate by the date
specified by this section.
SECTION 14.  ORS 408.505 is amended to read:
408.505. (1) As used in this section, “agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 183.310.
(2) In order to assist veterans in claiming federal benefits,  the Department of Veterans’ Affairs
and the  Oregon Military Department shall provide agencies with materials to inform individuals how
to contact the Department of Veterans’ Affairs and  the reintegration team within the Oregon Mili-
tary Department to request information about veterans’ benefits and services.
(3) An agency shall:
(a) Make available in offices that are accessible to the public the information  provided under
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) When appropriate, feasible and consistent with the agency’s mission,  make reasonable efforts
to:
(A) Ask a  customer or client who comes into contact with the agency if the customer or client
is a veteran; and
(B) Provide  the information provided under subsection (2) of this section to a customer or client
who states that the customer or client is a veteran.
(4) An agency may  cooperate with elected officials, local governments, school districts and
community colleges  to implement other measures to direct customers or clients to the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs or the reintegration team within the Oregon Military Department  to obtain in-
formation about veterans’ benefits and services.
[(5) On  or before October 1 of each even-numbered year, agency directors shall report to the ap-
propriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly on the effectiveness of measures undertaken
to implement the provisions of this section. ]
[(6)] (5) This section does not require an agency to respond to inquiries  from customers or cli-
ents about veterans’ benefits or services.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 315.133 is amended to read:
315.133. (1) As used in this section and ORS 315.135 and 315.136:
(a) “Agricultural worker” has the meaning given that term in ORS 653.271.
(b) “Eligible employer” means an employer doing business  in 2017 North American Industry
Classification System code 111, crop production, or code 112, animal production and aquaculture.
(c) “Full-time equivalent employee”  means an employee or a combination of employees that
perform at least 2,080 hours of work for an employer in a calendar year.
(2)(a) A credit against  taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 or, if the taxpayer
is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or  318 is allowed for overtime compensation required under
ORS 653.272 to be paid, for work performed in Oregon, by an eligible employer to  agricultural
workers on an hourly basis. The amount of the credit shall equal a percentage of the  actual excess
paid to agricultural  workers during the calendar year in which the tax year begins, as determined
under ORS 315.135.
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 8
(b) A labor contractor  licensed under ORS 658.410 may not claim a credit under this section.
An eligible employer may claim a credit under this section for wages paid  to workers recruited,
solicited, supplied or employed by a labor contractor on behalf of the eligible employer.
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 317.090  (3), a credit under this section is allowed against the tax im-
posed under ORS 317.090  (2)(a).
(d) A credit is not allowed under this section for any overtime wages paid  to an employee who
is exempt from the provisions of ORS 653.272 as a  member of the immediate family of the employer.
(3) Prior  to claiming the credit allowed under this section, a taxpayer is required to receive a
notice of acknowledgment from the Department of Revenue,  as provided in ORS 315.136, stating the
maximum amount of credit that the taxpayer may claim for the calendar year.
(4) If the amount allowable:
(a) As a credit under this section against taxes imposed under ORS  chapter 316, when added to
the sum of the amounts allowable as payment of tax  under ORS 316.187 or 316.583, other tax pre-
payment amounts and other refundable credit amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS  chapters
314 and 316 for the  tax year after application of any nonrefundable credits allowable for purposes
of ORS chapter 316 for the tax year, the amount of the excess shall be refunded to the  taxpayer as
provided in ORS 316.502.
(b) As a credit  under this section against taxes imposed under ORS chapter 317 or 318, when
added to the sum of the amount of  estimated tax paid under ORS 314.515 and any other tax pre-
payment amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS chapters 314 and 317  for the tax year (reduced
by any nonrefundable credits allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 317 for the tax  year), the
amount of the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer as provided in ORS 314.415.
(5) Any amount that  is refunded to the taxpayer under this section and that is in excess of the
tax liability of the taxpayer does not bear interest.
(6) A nonresident shall be allowed the credit under  this section. The credit shall be computed
in the same  manner and be subject to the same limitations as the credit granted to a resident.
However, the credit shall be prorated using the proportion provided in ORS 316.117.
(7) If a change in the taxable  year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or if the
Department of Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year  under ORS 314.440, the credit al-
lowed under this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
(8) If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident  to nonresident or from nonresident to
resident occurs, the credit allowed under this section shall be determined  in a manner consistent
with ORS 316.117.
(9) The Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for the purposes of  ORS 315.133 to 315.137,
including policies and procedures for providing notice to taxpayers regarding the credit  allowed
under this section as required in ORS 315.136.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 315.273 is amended to read:
315.273. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Dependent” means an individual who is under the age of six years at the close of the tax
year and who is a dependent of a  taxpayer as described in section 152(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code, determined without regard to section 152(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) “Qualifying child” has the meaning given that term in section 152(c) of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(c) “Qualifying income limit” means:
(A) For  a taxpayer other than a taxpayer described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, ad-
justed gross income, as  defined in section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified using Oregon
subtractions and additions,  but with [ losses of a taxpayer added back, to the extent that those losses
exceed $20,000; or ] the sum of the following added back:
(i) Losses of the taxpayer, to the extent that those losses exceed $20,000; and
(ii) Foreign earned income, as defined in section 911 of the Internal Revenue Code, that
is excluded from adjusted gross income.
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 9
(B) For a nonresident or part-year resident,  the greater of the amount determined under sub-
paragraph (A) of this paragraph, or adjusted gross income, as defined in section 62 of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(2) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under ORS chapter  316
for the tax year, with an amount allowed for each dependent of the taxpayer who  is a qualifying
child with respect to the taxpayer,  not to exceed five properly claimed dependents per tax return.
The credit shall be allowed as  provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section. A taxpayer may
claim a credit under this  section using an individual taxpayer identification number and may claim
it for dependents using individual taxpayer identification numbers.
(3) The credit under this section:
(a) Shall be in an amount of $1,000 per dependent of the taxpayer, but,  if the taxpayer has a
qualifying income limit in excess of $25,000, regardless of  the type of income tax return filed by the
taxpayer, the total amount of  the credit shall be reduced as provided in subsection (4) of this sec-
tion.
(b) May  not be claimed if the percentage calculated in subsection (4) of this section is greater
than or equal to 100 percent.
(c) May not be claimed by a married taxpayer who files a separate return.
(4) If a reduction under subsection (3)  of this section is required, the amount by which the credit
shall be reduced is computed by multiplying the amount otherwise available under subsection  (3) of
this section by a percentage. The percentage is  computed by dividing, by 5,000, the amount by which
the taxpayer’s qualifying income limit exceeds $25,000.
(5)(a) For tax years beginning  in each calendar year, the Department of Revenue shall adjust
the dollar amounts of the  credit and of the income threshold set forth in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section by multiplying each  dollar amount by the cost-of-living adjustment for the calendar year.
(b) For purposes  of paragraph (a) of this subsection, the cost-of-living adjustment for any calen-
dar year is the percentage (if any) by which  the monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer
Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar year exceeds  the
monthly averaged index for the second quarter of the calendar year 2022.
(c) As used in this subsection, “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.  City
Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (All Items)  as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(d) If any increase determined under paragraph (a) of this subsection is not  a multiple of $50,
the increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of $50.
(6)(a) If the  amount allowable as a credit under this section, when added to the sum of the
amounts allowable as payment of tax  under ORS 316.187 or 316.583, other tax prepayment amounts
and other refundable credit  amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS chapters 314 and 316 for
the tax year after application of any  nonrefundable credits allowable for purposes of ORS chapter
316 for  the tax year, the amount of the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer as provided in ORS
316.502.
(b) The credit under this section shall be computed after the  allowance of any other credit or
offset against tax liability.
(7) A nonresident or  part-year resident shall be allowed the credit under this section in the same
manner and, aside from the taxpayer’s applicable qualifying income limit, subject to the same  limi-
tations as a resident. However, the credit  shall be prorated using the proportion provided in ORS
316.117.
(8) If a change in the tax year of a taxpayer occurs as described in ORS  314.085, or if the De-
partment of Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s tax  year under ORS 314.440, the credit allowed by
this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
(9) If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident  to nonresident or from nonresident to
resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall be determined in  a manner consistent with
ORS 316.117.
(10) Refunds attributable to the child tax credit  allowed under this section do not bear interest.
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 10
SECTION 17. (1) The amendments to ORS 315.133  by section 15 of this 2025 Act apply to
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2023.
(2) The amendments to ORS 315.273 by  section 16 of this 2025 Act apply to tax years be-
ginning on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 18. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2339 (HB 2339-INTRO) Page 11